Utah statutes.
10-1-305.   Municipal energy sales and use tax ordinance provisions.
Each municipal energy sales and use tax ordinance under Subsection 10-1-304(1)
shall include:
(1)  a provision imposing a tax on every sale or use of taxable energy made
within a municipality at a rate determined by the municipality that is up to
6% of the delivered value of the taxable energy;
(2)  provisions substantially the same as those required by Title 59, Chapter
12, Part 1, Tax Collection, as they relate to sales and use tax, except that:
(a)  the tax shall be calculated on the delivered value of the taxable energy
to the consumer;
(b)  an exemption is not allowed from a tax imposed under this part for the
sale or use of taxable energy that is exempt from the state sales and use tax
under Title 59, Chapter 12, Part 1, Tax Collection, except that the
municipality shall include in its ordinance an exemption for:
(i)  the sales and use of aviation fuel, motor fuel, or special fuel subject
to taxation under Title 59, Chapter 13, Motor and Special Fuel Tax Act;
(ii)  the sales and use of taxable energy that the municipality is prohibited
from taxing under federal law or the Constitution of the United States or the
Utah Constitution;
(iii)  the sales and use of taxable energy purchased or stored in the state
for resale;
(iv)  the sales or use of taxable energy to a person if the primary use is for
use in compounding or producing taxable energy or a fuel subject to taxation
under Title 59, Chapter 13, Motor and Special Fuel Tax Act;
(v)  taxable energy brought into the state by a nonresident for the
nonresident’s own personal use or enjoyment while within the state, except
taxable energy purchased for use in the state by a nonresident living or
working in the state at the time of purchase;
(vi)  the sales or use of taxable energy for any purpose other than use as a
fuel or energy; and
(vii)  the sale of taxable energy for use outside a municipality imposing a
municipality energy sales and use tax;
(c)  the ordinance may provide for an exemption from the municipal energy
sales and use tax under this part for customers who, as of July 1, 1997, were
being supplied electrical energy by a supplier other than the municipality if:
(i)  the municipality is a generator of electrical energy for customers within
its borders; and
(ii)  the municipality is unable to generate electrical energy for the
customer;
(d)  the name of the municipality as the taxing agency shall be substituted
for that of the state when necessary for purposes of this part; and
(e)  an additional license to collect the tax is not required if one has been
issued under Section 59-12-106;
(3)  a provision that, on or before the effective date of the ordinance, the
municipality shall enter into a contract with the commission to have the
commission perform all functions related to the administration or operation of
the ordinance, except that a municipality may collect the municipal energy
sales and use tax directly as provided in Subsection 10-1-307(3);
(4)  a provision that:
(a)  except as provided under Subsection (4)(b), the sale, storage, use, or
other consumption of taxable energy is exempt from the tax due under the
ordinance if the delivered value of the taxable energy has been subject to a
municipal energy sales or use tax under an ordinance enacted in accordance
with this part by another municipality in this state; and
(b)  the municipality shall be paid the difference between the tax paid to
another municipality as described in this section and the tax that would
otherwise be due under the ordinance if the tax due under the ordinance
exceeds the tax paid to another municipality; and
(5)  a provision providing a credit against the tax in the amount of a
contractual franchise fee paid if:
(a)  an energy supplier pays a contractual franchise fee to a municipality
pursuant to a franchise agreement in effect on July 1, 1997;
(b)  the contractual franchise fee is passed through by the energy supplier to
a taxpayer as a separately itemized charge; and
(c)  the energy supplier has accepted the franchise; and
(6)  a provision providing that the ordinance adopts by reference any
amendments to the provisions of Title 59, Chapter 12, Part 1, Tax Collection,
that relate to levying or collecting a municipal energy sales and use tax.
